Utah statutes.
59-1-1006.   Application to jeopardy assessments and property tax.

The provisions of Section 59-1-1004 do not apply to jeopardy assessments authorized by Sections 59-1-701 through 59-1-707.  The provisions of this part do not apply to Title 59, Chapter 2, Property Tax Act.

